District of Columbia statutes.
38-1807.52

Access to fiscal and staffing data.

(a)

In general. —

The budget, financial-accounting, personnel, payroll, procurement, and management information systems of the District of Columbia public schools shall be coordinated and interface with related systems of the District of Columbia Government.

(b)

Access. —

The Board of Education shall provide read-only access to its internal financial management systems and all other data bases to designated staff of the Mayor, the Council, the Authority, and appropriate congressional committees.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [270], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2752
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.72.